Delaware, session 153, SB65.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: WHEREAS, Delawareâs participation in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative (âRGGIâ) was intended to reduce carbon dioxide (COâ) production; and WHEREAS, the original goal of RGGI was to reduce COâ emissions by 10% by 2019 from Delaware electrical power plants over 25 megawatts in size; and WHEREAS, Delaware has already far exceeded the goal, achieving a 45% reduction in COâ emissions; and WHEREAS, a Forbes study shows that the 10 fastest-growing states averaged real gross domestic product (âGDPâ) growth of 18.6% over 5 years while maintaining an average electricity price of 10.7 cents per kWh in 2024; and WHEREAS, the same study ranks Delaware 46th in GDP growth, with real GDP increasing by only 3% over the same period, while the State's average electricity price remains higher at 13.4 cents per kWh; and WHEREAS, high electricity costs place an economic burden on families and businesses, making Delaware less competitive for growth and investment; and WHEREAS, the costs associated with RGGI compliance are ultimately passed down to consumers, further increasing energy costs for Delaware households and businesses; and WHEREAS, states that have chosen not to participate in RGGI have maintained competitive electricity rates while still achieving environmental improvements through alternative policies. Section 1. Amend Chapter 60, Title 7 of the Delaware Code by repealing Subchapter II-A in its entirety.